Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.020

Certain board elections, manner and vote required—Selection of personnel, manner.

The election of the officers of the board of directors or to fill any vacancy as provided in *RCW 28A.315.530, and the selection of the school district superintendent shall be by oral call of the roll of all the members, and no person shall be declared elected or selected unless he or she receives a majority vote of all the members of the board. Selection of other certificated and classified personnel shall be made in such manner as the board shall determine.

[ 1997 c 13 s 8; 1990 c 33 s 342; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.040. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 290 s 4; RRS s 4793. Formerly RCW 28A.59.040, 28.62.040.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.530 was recodified as RCW 28A.343.370 pursuant to 1999 c 315 s 804.